Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-713
Investments in National Housing Act securities; general laws not applicable.

No law of this state requiring security upon which loans or investments may be made, or prescribing the nature, amount or form of such security, or prescribing or limiting interest rates upon loans or investments, or prescribing or limiting the periods for which loans or investments may be made, shall be deemed to apply to loans or investments made pursuant to sections 8-711 and 8-712.

Laws 1935, c. 17, § 3, p. 93;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-503;

R.S.1943, § 8-713.